Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.70.010

Ratification of compact.

The western regional higher education compact, recommended by the western governors' conference on November 10, 1950, for adoption by the states or territories of Arizona, California, Colorado, Idaho, Montana, Nevada, New Mexico, Oregon, Utah, Washington, Wyoming, Alaska and Hawaii, is hereby ratified and approved and the adherence of this state to the provisions of this compact, upon its ratification and approval by any four or more of such states or territories in addition to this state, is hereby declared.

[ 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28B.70.010. Prior: 1955 c 214 s 1. Formerly RCW 28.82.010.]